Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1104
Perfection.

Any security interest created by a governmental unit pursuant to an authorizing statute is perfected by the adoption of the measure or measures from the date on which the measure takes effect without the need for any physical delivery, filing, or recording in any office.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 20.